Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 4. Business Practices.

Sec. 06.20.200.
Advertising of misleading statements prohibited.

A person may not advertise, print, display, publish, distribute, or broadcast or cause or permit to be advertised, printed, displayed, published, distributed, or broadcast, in any manner any statement or representation with regard to the rates, terms, or conditions for the lending of money, credit, goods, or things in action in the amount or of the value of $25,000 or less, which is false, misleading, or deceptive. The department may order a licensee to desist from conduct that it finds to be in violation of this section.

The department may require rates of charge stated by a licensee to be stated fully and clearly in the manner considered necessary to prevent misunderstanding by prospective borrowers.

History.

(§ 13 ch 73 SLA 1955; am § 6 ch 71 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 63 SLA 1980)

Administrative Code. —

For small loans, see 3 AAC 12.

Sec. 06.20.210.
Use of premises restricted.

A licensee may not conduct the business of making loans under this chapter within an office, room, or place of business in which another business is solicited or engaged in, or in association or conjunction therewith, except as may be authorized in writing by the department upon its finding that the character of the other business is such that the granting of authority would not facilitate evasions of this chapter or the regulations lawfully adopted under this chapter.

History.

(§ 14 ch 73 SLA 1955)

Administrative Code. —

For small loans, see 3 AAC 12.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Neither the purchase of contracts nor the making of loans in excess of $1,000 (now $25,000) may be carried on within the place of business of the licensee without the express permission of the Department of Commerce and Economic Development. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 16.

Sec. 06.20.220.
Transactions limited to licensed premises.

A licensee may not transact business or make any loan under this chapter under any name or at any place of business other than that named in the license.

History.

(§ 15 ch 73 SLA 1955)

Administrative Code. —

For small loans, see 3 AAC 12.

Sec. 06.20.230.
Maximum interest permitted.

A licensee may lend any sum of money not exceeding $25,000 and may charge, contract for, and receive on the loan interest at a rate not exceeding three percent a month on that part of the unpaid principal balance of a loan not in excess of $850; two percent a month on the unpaid principal balance exceeding $850 but not exceeding $10,000; and at a rate agreed by contract on the remainder of any unpaid principal balance exceeding $10,000 but not exceeding $25,000.

Notwithstanding the provisions of (a) of this section, a licensee who makes open-end loans under this chapter may charge, contract for, and receive interest at a rate not exceeding three percent a month on that part of the unpaid principal balance of a loan not in excess of $850; two percent a month on the unpaid principal balance exceeding $850 but not exceeding $10,000; and at a rate agreed by contract on the remainder of any unpaid principal balance exceeding $10,000 but not exceeding $25,000.

Interest on loans under (b) of this section shall be computed according to the actuarial method on the entire unpaid principal balance as determined under AS

06.20.285(b)

.

History.

(§ 16(a) ch 73 SLA 1955; am § 5 ch 94 SLA 1969; am § 7 ch 71 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 84 SLA 1979; am § 3 ch 63 SLA 1980; am §§ 1, 2 ch 99 SLA 1982)

Administrative Code. —

For small loans, see 3 AAC 12.

Sec. 06.20.240.
Loans for purpose of obtaining higher interest.

A licensee may not induce or permit a person, or a husband and wife jointly or severally, to split up or divide a loan or to become obligated, directly or contingently or both, under more than one loan contract at the same time, for the purpose or with the result of obtaining a higher rate of interest than would otherwise be permitted by AS

06.20.230

. However, a licensee may enter into new or different loan transactions with the borrower or the borrower’s spouse at a different time so long as the purpose of the additional transaction does not violate this section.

History.

(§ 16(b) ch 73 SLA 1955; am § 8 ch 134 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For small loans, see 3 AAC 12.

Sec. 06.20.250.
Payments and interest.

Interest may not be paid, deducted, or received in advance. Except for open-end loans made under AS

06.20.285

, interest shall be computed and paid only on unpaid principal balances and may not be compounded; however, if part or all of the consideration for a loan contract is the unpaid principal balance of a prior loan, the principal amount payable under the loan contract may include any unpaid charges on the prior loan that have accrued within 60 days before the making of the loan contract. The maximum interest permitted on loans made under this chapter shall be computed on the basis of the number of days actually elapsed. For the purpose of these computations a month is any period of 30 consecutive days.

A licensee may compute interest for a loan as provided in this chapter on an interest-bearing or actuarial basis either at the rates stated in AS

06.20.230

or at the single annual percentage rate that would earn the same finance charge as the rates stated in AS

06.20.230

when the debt is paid according to the agreed terms and the calculations made according to the actuarial method.

Except for open-end loans under AS

06.20.285

, a licensee may not enter into a contract for a loan that provides for a scheduled repayment of principal over more than the maximum terms set out below opposite the respective size of loans.

Loan contracts must provide for substantially equal payments, and the payments must be due at least once a month, with the first payment beginning not later than 45 days from the date the loan is made.

If the irregular payment is confirmed in writing by the borrower, and the method of repayment is consistent with the maximum term and annual interest rate provided in this chapter, and if a borrower demonstrates sufficient seasonal or extraordinary income to support repayment of a loan, the loan contract may provide for irregular payments and first payment extensions greater than 45 days from the date the loan is made.

Principal amount of loan Maximum term
up to $1,000 24 and 1/2 months
Over $1,000 to $2,500 48 and 1/2 months
Over $2,500 to $5,000 60 and 1/2 months
Over $5,000 to $25,000 as agreed to by the parties

Click to view

History.

(§ 16(c) ch 73 SLA 1955; am § 8 ch 71 SLA 1978; am §§ 3, 4 ch 84 SLA 1979; am § 4 ch 63 SLA 1980; am § 9 ch 134 SLA 1996; am § 8 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For small loans, see 3 AAC 12.

Sec. 06.20.260.
Charges prohibited.

A further or other charge or amount for an examination, service, brokerage commission, expense, fee, bonus, or other thing may not be directly or indirectly charged, contracted for, or received except

lawful fees actually paid out by the licensee to a public officer for filing, recording, or releasing any instrument securing the loan, or premiums payable for insurance in lieu of perfecting a security interest if the premiums do not exceed the fees that would otherwise normally be incurred for perfecting, filing, recording, and releasing the security interest, or for transferring certificate of title to a motor vehicle securing the lien or noting a lien on that certificate;

premiums actually paid out for insurance on any one or combination of the following: pledged property of the borrower, or consumer credit insurance; in this paragraph, “consumer credit insurance” has the meaning given in AS

21.57.160

;

taxable costs and expenses to which the licensee becomes entitled under general law in any court proceedings to collect a loan or to realize on the security after default;

for loans of $10,000 or less that are secured by an interest in real estate, reasonable costs and fees paid by a licensee for appraisals, surveys, and title insurance or reports;

for loans over $10,000, whether or not secured by an interest in real estate, reasonable costs and fees paid by a licensee for appraisals, surveys, title insurance or reports, and credit reports;

a late payment fee of not more than 10 percent of the payment that is due or $25, whichever is less;

a fee for dishonored checks not to exceed $25 for each dishonored check;

reasonable attorney fees, actual expenses, and costs incurred in connection with the collection of a delinquent debt or a foreclosure if the collection or foreclosure is referred to an attorney who is not a salaried employee of the licensee and the balance then owing on the debt exceeds $5,000;

actual expenses and costs incurred in connection with a repossession.

A licensee may collect the charges permitted under (a) of this section at the time when the loan is made or at any time thereafter. If any interest, consideration, or charges in excess of those permitted by AS

06.20.230

are charged, contracted for, or received, except as the result of an accidental and bona fide error in computation, the contract of loan is modified as follows: all interest, consideration, or charges involved are voided and a like amount credited to the debtor on the principal of the loan. If the unpaid principal is less than the total of the interest, consideration, and charges, the difference shall be refunded by the lender to the borrower.

History.

(§ 16(d) ch 73 SLA 1955; am §§ 9, 16 ch 71 SLA 1978; am § 5 ch 84 SLA 1979; am § 3 ch 99 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 39 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 10 ch 134 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For small loans, see 3 AAC 12.

Opinions of attorney general. —

“Service charges,” being also consideration for the use of money, should be included in calculating the rate of interest, except those fees excluded by this section. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 16.

Sec. 06.20.270.
Requirements for making and payment of loans.

Except as provided in AS

06.20.285

for open-end loans, every licensee shall

deliver to the borrower at the time a loan is made a statement containing a printed copy of AS

06.20.230

—

06.20.260

in the English language and showing in clear and distinct terms the amount and date of the loan and its maturity, the nature of the security, if any, for the loan, the name and address of the borrower and the licensee, and the agreed rate of charge;

give to the borrower a plain and complete receipt for all payments made on account of the loan at the time payments are made, specifying the amount applied to interest and the amount, if any, applied to principal, and stating the unpaid principal balance, if any, of the loan;

permit payment to be made in advance in any amount on a contract of loan at any time, but the licensee may apply the advance payment first to all interest in full at the agreed rate up to the date of payment;

upon repayment of the loan in full, mark indelibly every obligation and security signed by the borrower with the word “Paid” or “Cancelled,” and release any mortgage, restore any pledge, cancel and return any note, and cancel and return any assignment given to the licensee by the borrower;

display prominently in each licensed place of business a full and accurate schedule, approved by the department, of the charges to be made and the method of computing them.

History.

(§ 17 ch 73 SLA 1955; am § 6 ch 84 SLA 1979)

Administrative Code. —

For small loans, see 3 AAC 12.

Sec. 06.20.280.
Maximum charge by licensee.

A licensee may not directly or indirectly charge, contract for, or receive any interest, discount, or consideration greater than that which the licensee would be permitted by law to charge if the person were not a licensee under this chapter, upon the loan, use or forbearance of money, goods, or things in action, or upon the loan, use, or sale of credit, of the amount or value of more than $25,000.
This section applies to any licensee who permits any person, as borrower or endorser, guarantor, or surety for any borrower, or otherwise, to owe directly or contingently or both to the licensee at any time a sum of more than $25,000 on principal.

History.

(§ 18 ch 73 SLA 1955; am § 10 ch 71 SLA 1978; am § 5 ch 63 SLA 1980)

Cross references. —

For legal rate of interest, see AS

45.45.010

.

Administrative Code. —

For small loans, see 3 AAC 12.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The act of charging an interest rate in excess of that prescribed in AS

45.45.080(b)

is grounds for revocation of the lender’s small loan license, regardless of whether the loan is consummated or administered in the same place of business. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 16.

“Service charges,” being also consideration for the use of money should be included in calculating the rate of interest except those fees excluded by AS

06.20.260

. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 16.

The bona fide purchase of installment contract paper is an activity distinct from the lending of money, and a discount at any rate is not usurious unless the transfer is merely a cloak for a usurious loan. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 16.

If the installment contract paper discounted is usurious on its face, then the licensee is in violation of this section in that it is “receiving” the usurious interest, even though it did not directly contract for it. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 16.

Sec. 06.20.285.
Open-end loans.

A licensee may make open-end loans not exceeding an aggregate total of $25,000 and may contract for and receive interest on open-end loans as provided in AS

06.20.230

, and for other charges permitted under this chapter. Interest on open-end loans may be computed daily or monthly on the unpaid principal balance or the average unpaid principal balance if the interest charged as a result of these computations does not exceed the rates stated in AS

06.20.230

when the interest is computed according to the interest-bearing or actuarial method.

The billing cycle for open-end loans is monthly, and the unpaid principal balance on a certain day is computed by adding to the balance unpaid on the beginning of that day, or the average unpaid daily balance for that billing cycle, all advances and other permissible amounts charged to the borrower and deducting all payments and other credits made or received that day.

A licensee may secure the payment of an open-end loan in the same manner as other loans under this chapter may be secured.

The licensee shall deliver a copy of the open-end loan agreement to the borrower at the time the open-end loan account is opened. The open-end loan agreement must contain the name and address of the licensee and the borrower and must contain disclosures of finance charges and agreed terms as may be required by regulations adopted by the department and the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System.

At the end of each billing cycle in which there is an outstanding balance in the account for which a finance charge is imposed, the licensee shall deliver to the borrower a statement in the form required by regulations adopted by the department and the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System. This subsection does not apply to accounts that the licensee considers uncollectible or for which an action to collect past due amounts has been filed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1979; am § 6 ch 63 SLA 1980)

Sec. 06.20.287.
Insurance on open-end loans.

A licensee may obtain consumer credit, credit loss of income, and property insurance on open-end loans under this chapter. The consumer credit insurance obtained by a licensee shall satisfy the requirements of AS 21.57. The property insurance obtained by a licensee shall satisfy the requirements of AS 21.39 and AS 21.42. The licensee shall comply with AS

21.36.160

and

21.36.319

during all transactions with borrowers involving consumer credit, credit loss of income, and property insurance.

The licensee shall calculate the charge for credit life, credit loss of income, or disability insurance in each billing cycle by adding to the unpaid balance in the borrower’s account the current monthly premium rate for the coverage required at the rate set under AS 21.57, using the method specified in the loan agreement for determining the unpaid balance.

A licensee may not cancel credit life, credit loss of income, or disability insurance obtained for an open-end loan if the borrower is delinquent in paying the monthly installments unless an installment is delinquent for 90 days or longer. The licensee shall advance to the insurer amounts necessary to keep the policy in force until the 90-day delinquency period has elapsed, and the borrower’s account may be charged for the amounts advanced to the insurer.

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 1979; am § 2 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 11 ch 134 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, in subsection (a), “21.36.319” was substituted for “21.36.165” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS

21.36.165

.

Sec. 06.20.290.
Purchase of wages or other compensation for $25,000 or less.

For purposes of this chapter, the payment of $25,000 or less in money, credit, goods, or things in action, as consideration for the sale or assignment of, or order for, the payment of wages, salary, commissions, or other compensation for services, whether earned or to be earned, is considered a loan, and the difference between the payment and the amount of the compensation sold or assigned is considered interest or a charge upon the loan from the date of payment to the date the compensation is payable. Such a transaction is governed by this chapter.

History.

(§ 19 ch 73 SLA 1955; am § 11 ch 71 SLA 1978; am § 7 ch 63 SLA 1980)

Sec. 06.20.300.
Maximum charges by nonlicensee on loans.

Except as authorized in this chapter, a person may not directly or indirectly charge, contract for, or receive any interest, discount, or consideration greater than that which the person would be permitted by law to charge if the person were not a licensee, upon the loan, use, or forbearance of money, goods, or things in action, or upon the loan, use, or sale of credit of the amount or value of $25,000 or less.

The provisions of (a) of this section apply to any person who, by any device, subterfuge, or pretense whatsoever charges, contracts for, or receives greater interest, consideration, or charges than are authorized by this chapter.

History.

(§ 20(a), (b) ch 73 SLA 1955; am § 12 ch 71 SLA 1978; am § 8 ch 63 SLA 1980)